Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB908.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9778. Termination of long-term parole supervision.(a) Termination.--If an individual is under parole supervision subsequent to the imposition of a sentence by a sentencing court, upon petition of the department or the individual, the sentencing court may terminate the remainder of the sentence for which the individual is under parole supervision in accordance with this section.(b) Petition.--A petition to terminate the remainder of a sentence of an individual under this section must:(1) Be filed in the sentencing court.1234567891011121314151617 (2) Aver that the individual:(i) Is at least 40 years of age.(ii) Has been under parole supervision, as a result of the sentence, for at least five consecutive years.(c) Considerations.--Upon receipt of a petition under subsection (b), the sentencing court shall determine whether to grant the petition. In making the determination, the sentencing court shall:(1) Confirm whether the averments under subsection (b) (2) are true.(2) Consider the following regarding the individual who is the subject of the petition:(i) Whether the individual will pose an undue risk of danger to the community if the petition is granted.(ii) The institutional conduct record of the individual.(iii) The conduct record of the individual while under parole supervision.(iv) The length of the original sentence of the individual.(v) Whether continuing parole supervision of the individual is likely to cause undue financial or personal hardship to the individual.(vi) Whether continuing parole supervision of the individual is likely to produce an inefficient use of the department's resources in supervising parolees.(vii) Whether the individual has made a good faith effort to comply with any restitution orders and pay any mandatory court fees.(viii) Any other factor which the court deems 20250HB0908PN0949 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 relevant to determine whether the best interests of the individual and the Commonwealth would be served by granting the petition.(d) Service.--A petition filed under this section shall be served on the following:(1) The individual who is the subject of the petition, unless the individual is the petitioner.(2) The department, unless the department is the petitioner.(3) The office of the prosecuting attorney representing the Commonwealth.(4) Any victim of crime entitled to notification under section 201(7) or (8) of the act of November 24, 1998 (P.L.882, No.111), known as the Crime Victims Act.(e) Determination.--Each party specified under subsection (d) shall:(1) Have an opportunity to be heard on the petition prior to the determination of whether the petition should be granted.(2) Receive a copy of the determination regarding the petition.(f) Applicability.--This section shall apply to any parole supervision or sentence imposed before, on or after the effective date of this subsection.(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Corrections of the Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0908PN0949 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930